Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 21-112.22.
Definitions.

Whenever the words
“circuit court”
are used in this chapter, they shall also be construed to mean “circuit or corporation court” of a city; whenever the word

“county”

appears in this chapter, it shall also be construed to mean “city,” and whenever the words

“governing body of a county”

shall appear, they shall also be construed to mean “city council.”

History.

1964, c. 525.

Cross references.

As to creation, enlargement, contraction, etc., of sanitary districts, see §

15.2-858

.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 5 of Title 17, providing for corporation courts in general, which are referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1973, c. 544. See now provisions as to circuit courts, §

17.1-500

et seq.

§ 21-113.
Creation; inclusion of town in new or enlarged district.

The governing body of a county in the Commonwealth, upon the petition of 50 qualified voters of a proposed district or, if the proposed district contains less than 100 qualified voters, upon petition of 50 percent of the qualified voters of the proposed district, may, by ordinance, create a sanitary district or districts in and for the county, which ordinance shall prescribe the metes and bounds of the district.

With the approval of the board of supervisors of a county and the council of any town therein, such town or any part thereof may be included within a sanitary district created or enlarged under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1930, p. 1002; 1933, p. 32; 1936-7, p. 69; Michie Code 1942, § 1560m; 1970, c. 584; 2017, c. 14.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 substituted “governing body of a county in the Commonwealth” for “circuit court of any county in this Commonwealth, or the judge of such court in vacation,” “may by ordinance, create” for “may make an order creating” and “which ordinance” for “which order” in the first paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article, “Local Government Law in Virginia, 1870-1970,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 174 (1970).

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

§ 21-114.
Hearing and notice thereof.

Upon the filing of the petition, the governing body of a county shall fix a day for a hearing on the question of the proposed sanitary district, which hearing shall embrace a finding of fact of whether creation of the proposed district or enlargement of the existing district is necessary, practical, fiscally responsible, and supported by at least 50 percent of persons who own real property in (i) the proposed district or (ii) in cases of enlargement, the area proposed to be included in an existing district. All interested persons who reside in or who own real property in (a) a proposed district or (b) an existing district in cases of enlargement shall have the right to appear and show cause why the property under consideration should or should not be included in the proposed district or enlargement of same at such hearing. Such hearing shall be subject to minimum standards regarding timeliness; notice of such hearing shall be given by publication once a week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation within the county to be designated by the governing body. At least 10 days shall intervene between the completion of the publication and the date set for the hearing, and such publication shall be considered complete on the twenty-first day after the first publication, and no such district shall be created until the notice has been given and the hearing had.

History.

1930, p. 1002; 1940, p. 173; Michie Code 1942, § 1560n; 1985, c. 104; 2017, c. 14.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 rewrote the section.

§ 21-115.
Answer and defense.

Any person interested may answer the petition and make defense thereto; and if upon such hearing the governing body of a county be of opinion that any property embraced within the limits of such proposed district will not be benefited by the establishment of such district, then such property shall not be embraced therein.

History.

1940, p. 173; Michie Code 1942, § 1560n; 2017, c. 14.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 substituted “governing body of a county” for “court, or the judge thereof in vacation, as the case may be.”

§ 21-116.
Enlargement of sanitary districts.

The governing body of a county, upon the petition of 25 percent of the qualified voters, if any, residing within the limits of the territory proposed to be added, may, by ordinance, extend the boundaries and enlarge any sanitary district created under the provisions of this article, which ordinance shall prescribe the metes and bounds of the territory so added.

Upon the filing of the petition a hearing shall be had as provided in §§

21-114

and

21-115

, and the notice of such hearing may require all interested persons to appear and show cause why any special tax levied or to be levied in the sanitary district for special sanitary district purposes may not be likewise levied and collected in the territory proposed to be added to such district, and to appear and show cause why the net operating revenue derived in the added territory from the operation of any system or systems established under the provisions of §

21-118

may not be set apart to pay the interest on and retire at maturity the principal of any bonds theretofore issued in connection with such system or systems. Nothing in such ordinance enlarging a sanitary district as provided herein shall be construed to limit or adversely affect the rights and interests of any holder of bonds issued by the district, and such ordinance shall expressly preserve and protect such rights and interests. All interested persons who reside in or who own real property in (i) a proposed district or (ii) an existing district in cases of enlargement shall have the right to appear and show cause why the property under consideration should or should not be included in the proposed district or enlargement of same at such hearing.

History.

1947, p. 136; Michie Suppl. 1948, § 1560s4; 1964, c. 517; 1985, c. 104; 2017, c. 14.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 substituted “The governing body of a county, upon the petition of 25 percent” for “The circuit court, or the judge of such court in vacation upon the petition of the governing body of the county and of twenty-five percent,” “by ordinance, extend” for “make an order extending” and “enlarge” for “enlarging” in the first paragraph, and substituted “ordinance” for “order” throughout the section.

§ 21-116.1.
Alteration of boundaries or reduction of area of sanitary districts in certain counties.

Chapter 549 of the Acts of 1950, as amended by Acts 1952, c. 202, relating to alteration of boundaries or reduction of area of sanitary districts in any county adjoining a county having a population in excess of 2,000 per square mile, is incorporated in this Code by this reference.

History.

1950, c. 549; 1952, c. 202.

§ 21-117.
Merger of sanitary districts.

Any two or more sanitary districts heretofore or hereafter created in any county under the provisions of this article may be merged into a single district by the governing body of the county, by ordinance, upon the petition of not less than 50 qualified voters residing within the boundaries of each of the districts desiring to be so merged, which ordinance shall prescribe the metes and bounds and the name or other designation of the single district created by such merger. From and after the adoption of such ordinance, the governing body of such county shall, as to the single districts so created, have all the powers and duties, and be subject to all the conditions and limitations prescribed by §

21-118

, and all funds then on hand to the credit of each of the districts so merged shall be merged into a single fund for the use and benefit of the consolidated district, unless otherwise ordered by the governing body of the county upon the hearing next herein provided for.

Upon the filing of the petition, a hearing shall be had before the governing body of the county, after notice as provided by §

21-114

, which notice shall require all interested parties to appear and show cause, if any they can, (i) why the funds then on hand to the credit of each of the merged districts should not be merged into a single fund for the purpose above mentioned; and (ii) why a special tax should not be levied on all the property within the limits of the consolidated district, subject to local taxation, sufficient to pay the interest and create a sinking fund for payment of the principal at maturity of any then outstanding bonds theretofore issued by any one or more of the districts so merged.

Upon the hearing, such ordinance shall be adopted as to the governing body of the county may seem equitable and proper, concerning the combination of the funds on hand to the credit of each of the districts so merged and the levying of a special tax on all the taxable property within the limits of the consolidated district, for the purposes hereinabove mentioned, provided that such ordinance shall preserve and protect the rights of the holders of any such outstanding bonds, whose rights and interests shall not be limited or affected by any of the provisions of this section.

History.

1942, p. 247; Michie Code 1942, § 1560s1; 2017, c. 14.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 substituted “ordinance” for “order” throughout the section; substituted “the governing body of the county, by ordinance,” for “an order entered by the circuit court of such county, or the judge thereof in vacation” in the first sentence, substituted “adoption of such ordinance” for “entry of such order” and “governing body of the county” for “court or judge” in the second sentence of the first paragraph; in the third paragraph, substituted “adopted as to the governing body of the county” for “made and entered as to the court or judge”; and made minor stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sanitary district is limited to operating and maintaining

community buildings and recreational facilities that are located within the boundaries of the district, unless it reaches an agreement with another jurisdiction to operate buildings and facilities outside those boundaries. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Clifford L. “Clay” Athey, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 10-073, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 55 (9/9/10).

§ 21-117.1.
Abolishing sanitary districts.

Any sanitary district heretofore or hereafter created in any county under the provisions of the preceding sections of this article may be abolished by ordinance adopted by the governing body of such county, upon the petition of no less than 50 qualified voters residing within the boundaries of the district desired to be abolished or, if the district contains less than 100 qualified voters, upon petition of 50 percent of the qualified voters residing within the boundaries of such district.

Upon filing of the petition, the governing body of the county shall fix a day for a hearing on the question of abolishing the sanitary district, which hearing shall embrace a consideration of whether the property in the sanitary district will or will not be benefited by the abolition thereof, and the governing body of the county shall be fully informed as to the obligations and functions of the sanitary district. Notice of such hearing shall be given by publication once a week for three consecutive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation within the county to be designated by the governing body of the county. At least 10 days shall intervene between the completion of the publication and the date set for hearing, and such publication shall be considered complete on the twenty-first day after the first publication, and no such district shall be abolished until the notice has been given and the hearing had.

Any interested parties may appear and be heard on any matters pertaining to the subject of the hearing.

Upon the hearing, such ordinance shall be adopted as to the governing body of the county may seem equitable and proper, concerning the abolition of the district and as to the funds on hand to the credit of the district, provided, however, that no such ordinance shall be adopted abolishing the sanitary district unless any bonds of the sanitary district that have theretofore been issued have been redeemed and the purposes for which the sanitary district was created have been completed, or unless all obligations and functions of the sanitary district have been taken over by the county as a whole, or unless the purposes for which the sanitary district was created are impractical or impossible of accomplishment and no obligations have been incurred by said sanitary district.

History.

1954, c. 135; 2017, c. 14.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 rewrote the section.

§ 21-118.
Powers and duties of governing body.

After the adoption of such ordinance creating a sanitary district in such county, the governing body thereof shall have the following powers and duties, subject to the conditions and limitations hereinafter prescribed:

To construct, maintain and operate water supply, sewerage, garbage removal and disposal, heat, light, fire-fighting equipment and power and gas systems and sidewalks for the use and benefit of the public in such sanitary districts.

To acquire by gift, condemnation, purchase, lease, or otherwise, and to maintain and operate any such water supply, sewerage, garbage removal and disposal, heat, light, fire-fighting equipment and power and gas systems and sidewalks in such district and to acquire by gift, condemnation, purchase, lease, or otherwise, rights, title, interest, or easements therefor in and to real estate in such district; and to sell, lease as lessor, transfer or dispose of any part of any such property, real, personal or mixed, so acquired in such manner and upon such terms as the governing body of the district may determine to be in the best interests of the district; provided a public hearing is first held with respect to such disposition at which inhabitants of the district shall have an opportunity to be heard. At least ten days’ notice of the time and place of such hearing and a brief description of the property to be disposed shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. Such public hearing may be adjourned from time to time.

To contract with any person, firm, corporation or municipality to construct, establish, maintain and operate any such water supply, sewerage, garbage removal and disposal, heat, light, fire-fighting equipment and power and gas systems and sidewalks in such district.

To require owners or tenants of any property in the district to connect with any such system or systems, and to contract with the owners or tenants for such connections. The owners or tenants shall have the right of appeal to the circuit court or the judge thereof in vacation within 10 days from action by the governing body.

To fix and prescribe or change the rates of charge for the use of any such system or systems after a public hearing upon notice as provided in §

21-118.4 (d)

, and to provide for the collection of such charges. In fixing such rates the sanitary district may seek the advice of the State Corporation Commission.

To levy and collect an annual tax upon all the property in such sanitary district subject to local taxation to pay, either in whole or in part, the expenses and charges incident to constructing, maintaining and operating water supply, sewerage, garbage removal and disposal, heat, light, fire-fighting equipment and power and gas systems and sidewalks for the use and benefit of the public in such sanitary district. Any locality imposing a tax pursuant to this subdivision may base the tax on the full assessed value of the taxable property within the district, notwithstanding any special use value assessment of property within the sanitary district for land preservation pursuant to Article 4 (§

58.1-3229

et seq.) of Chapter 32 of Title 58.1, provided the owner of such property has given written consent.

To employ and fix the compensation of any technical, clerical or other force and help which from time to time, in their judgment, may be deemed necessary for the construction, operation or maintenance of any such system or systems and sidewalks.

To negotiate and contract with any person, firm, corporation or municipality with regard to the connections of any such system or systems with any other system or systems now in operation or hereafter established, and with regard to any other matter necessary and proper for the construction or operation and maintenance of any such system within the sanitary district.

The governing body shall have the same power and authority for the abatement of nuisances in such sanitary district as is vested by law in councils of cities and towns for the abatement of nuisances therein, and it shall be the duty of the governing body to exercise such power when any such nuisance shall be shown to exist.

Proceedings for the acquisition of rights, title, interest or easements in and to real estate, by such sanitary districts in all cases in which they now have or may hereafter be given the right of eminent domain, may be instituted and conducted in the name of such sanitary district. If the property proposed to be condemned is:

For a waterworks system, the procedure shall be in the manner and under the restrictions prescribed by Chapter 19.1 (§

15.2-1908

et seq.) of Title 15.2, and by Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1;

For the purpose of constructing water or sewer lines, the proceedings shall be instituted and conducted in accordance with the procedures prescribed either by Chapter 2 of Title 25.1 or in Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1; or

For the purpose of constructing water and sewage treatment plants and facilities and improvements reasonably necessary to the construction and operation thereof, the proceedings shall be instituted and conducted in accordance with the procedures provided for the condemnation of land in Chapter 3 of Title 25.1.

To appoint, employ and compensate out of the funds of the district as many persons as special policemen as may be deemed necessary to maintain order and enforce the criminal and police laws of the Commonwealth and of the county within such district. Such special policemen shall have, within such district and within one-half mile thereof, all of the powers vested in policemen appointed under the provisions of Article 1 (§

15.2-1700

et seq.) of Chapter 17 of Title 15.2.

History.

1930, p. 1002; 1934, p. 494; 1936, p. 463; 1938, p. 19; Michie Code 1942, § 1560a; 1952, c. 113; 1956, c. 588; 1960, c. 36; 1962, c. 497; 1976, cc. 585, 684; 1977, cc. 276, 516; 1981, c. 564; 2002, c. 194; 2003, c. 940; 2017, c. 14.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 194 added the last sentence of subdivision (6).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940 redesignated subdivisions (1) to (11) as subdivisions 1 to 11; and rewrote present subdivision 10.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 substituted “adoption of such ordinance” for “entry of such order” in the introductory paragraph.

§ 21-118.1.
Authority to acquire property from United States or any agency thereof.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the governing body of any sanitary district may, by ordinance or resolution, authorize the acquisition and purchase from the United States, or any agency thereof, whether now existing or hereafter created, of any equipment, supplies, materials, or other property, real or personal, in such manner as such governing body may determine.

It is the purpose of this section to enable sanitary districts to secure from time to time promptly the benefits of acquisitions and purchases as authorized by this section, to aid them in securing advantageous purchases, to prevent unemployment and thereby to assist in promotion of public welfare and to these ends such districts shall have power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out such purpose, in addition to the expressed power conferred by this section. This section is remedial in nature and the powers hereby granted shall be liberally construed.

History.

1945, p. 35; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 2734e.

§ 21-118.2.
Certain counties authorized to use sanitary district funds for certain purposes.

The board of supervisors of any county operating sanitary districts under the provisions of this chapter as amended or under the provisions of an act or acts continued in effect by §

21-120

, may use sanitary district funds for police protection and for construction and operation of community houses within the district, provided that this section shall apply only to Chesterfield County and Henrico County. Action hereunder shall be subject to the rights of the holders of any bonds issued by such district.

History.

1952, c. 26; 2007, c. 813.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Chesterfield County and Henrico County” for “a county having a population in excess of 55,000 and adjoining a city within the Commonwealth having a population in excess of 230,000” near the end of the first sentence.

§ 21-118.3.
Levy and expenditure of taxes in certain counties; validation of expenditures.

In addition to the powers granted in §

21-118

of the Code of Virginia, the governing body of any county having a population in excess of 30,000 but not in excess of 35,000 and containing two cities of the first class, in which a sanitary district has been created pursuant to the provisions of this article, may levy and collect an annual tax upon all the property in such sanitary district subject to local taxation to pay the whole or any part of the cost of construction of a sewerage and/or water supply system in such district and to pay the costs of preliminary engineering surveys and other expenses in connection with the construction of any such system.

Such governing body may expend funds from the general county levy to pay the costs for which taxes are hereinabove authorized to be levied in anticipation of the collection of such taxes. Should it be determined that a sewerage and/or water supply system in such district is not feasible, or for any other reason should the same not be constructed, the governing body of said county, after the creation of such district has been ordered, may levy and collect an annual tax upon all the property within the boundaries of such sanitary district subject to local taxation, to reimburse the county’s general levy fund for any expenditures advanced therefrom in connection with engineering surveys and other expenses in and about the creation of any such district. Any such expenditure made prior to April 3, 1952, is hereby validated.

History.

1952, c. 555.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission for better arrangement, the number of this section in the 1952 act having been

21-118.2

.